North Dakota, session 69, HB1376.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 15.1-19 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Cardiopulmonary resuscitation training - High school students .
1. Each high school shall offer students annual cardiopulmonary resuscitation training
with optional certification for a student who wishes to become certified, which must:
a. Be provided by an instructor certified by the American heart association, the
American red cross, or another nonprofit organization nationally recognized for
cardiopulmonary resuscitation training.
b. Be conducted according to guidelines established by a certifying organization
under subdivision a .
c. Include training to stop the bleeding of a severely injured person.
2. The superintendent of public instruction shall reimburse school districts for the costs
incurred to provide cardiopulmonary resuscitation certification to high school students.
Page No. 1 25.0758.03000